Utah statutes.
9-3-402.   Legislative findings -- State purpose.
(1)  The Legislature finds and declares that:
(a)  a Utah Science Center Authority can promote science, Utah's effort in
high technology, engineering, the arts, culture, Utah's unique origins, and
can enhance tourism and provide a valuable educational forum, and other
benefits for Utah's citizens;
(b)  fostering the development of science, arts, tourism, culture, and
educational facilities is a state purpose affecting the welfare of all state
citizens and the growth of the economy statewide.
(2)  It is therefore the purpose of this part that the state provide a means
to foster the development of science, technology, engineering, arts, tourism,
cultural, and educational facilities in order to further the welfare of the
citizens of the state and its economic growth.
